sk-SK: Typ pridania odporu: Digitálny odpor; Hybridný (kotúče a tehličky); Kotúčový; Tehličkový; Iné
nl: Weerstandsbelasting type: Digitale weerstand; Hybride (halterschijven en steekgewichten); Halterschijven; Steekgewichten; Overig
hu: Ellenállási terhelés típusa: Digitális ellenállás; Hibrid (tárcsás és lapsúlyos); Tárcsasúlyos; Lapsúlyos; Egyéb
ru: Тип нагрузки сопротивления: Цифровое сопротивление; Гибридное (диски и стек); Нагружаемое дисками; Грузоблочный стек; Другое
fi: Vastuskuormituksen tyyppi: Digitaalinen vastus; Hybridi (levyt ja pakka); Levypainokuormitteinen; Säädettävä painopakka; Muu
cs: Typ odporového zatížení: Digitální odpor; Hybridní (kotouče a sloupec závaží); Na kotouče; Sloupec závaží s kolíkem; Jiné
ko: 저항 부하 유형: 디지털 저항; 하이브리드(플레이트 및 스택); 플레이트 로드; 셀렉터라이즈 웨이트 스택; 기타
pt-BR: Resistência carregamento tipo: Resistência digital; Híbrida (anilha e bateria de pesos); Carregamento por anilhas; Bateria de pesos com seletor; Outro
th: ประเภทการรับแรงต้านทาน: แรงต้านดิจิทัล; ไฮบริด (แผ่นน้ำหนักและแบบเรียงซ้อน); โหลดแผ่นน้ำหนัก; แผ่นน้ำหนักแบบเรียงซ้อนที่เลือกได้; อื่นๆ
ja: 抵抗負荷タイプ: デジタルレジスタンス; ハイブリッド（プレートおよびスタック）; プレートロード; セレクチャライズドウェイトスタック; その他
en: Resistance loading type: Digital resistance; Hybrid (plate and stack); Plate loaded; Selectorized weight stack; Other
da: Modstandsbelastningstype: Digital modstand; Hybrid (skiver og magasin); Skivebelastet; Vægtmagasin med stift; Andet
de: Art der Widerstandsbelastung: Digitaler Widerstand; Hybrid (Hantelscheiben und Gewichtsblock); Mit Hantelscheiben; Gewichtsblock mit Steckstift; Sonstiges
it: Tipo di carico di resistenza: Resistenza digitale; Ibrida (dischi e pacco pesi); A caricamento dischi; Pacco pesi a selezione; Altro
tr: Direnç yükleme tipi: Dijital direnç; Hibrit (plaka ve ağırlık seti); Plaka yüklemeli; Seçilebilir ağırlık seti; Diğer
el: Τύπος φόρτισης αντίστασης: Ψηφιακή αντίσταση; Υβριδική (δίσκοι και στοίβα βαρών); Με δίσκους βαρών; Επιλεγόμενη στοίβα βαρών; Άλλο
hr-HR: Vrsta opterećenja otpora: Digitalni otpor; Hibridno (ploče i utezi); S pločastim utezima; Selektirani sustav utega; Ostalo
ro-RO: Tip de încărcare a rezistenței: Rezistență digitală; Hibrid (discuri și stivă de greutăți); Cu discuri; Stivă de greutăți cu selector; Altele
sv: Typ av motståndsbelastning: Digitalt motstånd; Hybrid (viktskivor och viktmagasin); Viktskivebelastad; Inställbart viktmagasin; Annat
vi: Loại tải điện trở: Lực cản kỹ thuật số; Hỗn hợp (đĩa tạ và khối tạ); Dùng đĩa tạ; Khối tạ có chốt chọn; Khác
bg-BG: Тип натоварване на съпротивлението: Цифрово съпротивление; Хибридно (дискове и блокове); Зареждане с дискове; Селектиран блок с тежести; Други
es: Tipo de carga de resistencia: Resistencia digital; Híbrido (placas y bloque); Carga de placas; Bloque de pesas con selector; Otro
nb: Type motstandsbelastning: Digital motstand; Hybrid (vektskive og magasin); Vektskivebelastet; Vektmagasin; Annet
zh-CN: 阻力加载类型: 数字阻力; 混合（配重片和配重块）; 挂片式; 插销式配重块; 其他
fr: Type de charge de résistance: Résistance numérique; Hybride (disques et colonne); À disques; Colonne de poids à sélecteur; Autre
pl: Typ obciążenia rezystancyjnego: Opór cyfrowy; Hybrydowy (obciążenia i stos); Na obciążenia talerzowe; Stos obciążeń; Inne
pt-PT: Tipo de carga de resistência: Resistência digital; Híbrida (discos e pilha); Carga por discos; Pilha de pesos selecionável; Outro
sl-SI: Vrsta obremenitve z uporom: Digitalni upor; Hibridno (plošče in uteži); Nalaganje plošč; Uteži z izbiro; Drugo
lt-LT: Pasipriešinimo apkrovos tipas: Skaitmeninis pasipriešinimas; Hibridinis (diskinis ir blokinis); Pakraunamas svorių diskais; Reguliuojamų svorių blokas; Kita
zh-TW: 阻力負載類型: 數位阻力; 混合 (槓片與配重塊); 槓片裝載式; 插銷式配重塊; 其他